Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.020

Definitions.

The terms defined in this section shall have the meaning ascribed to them wherever appearing in this chapter, unless a different meaning is specifically used to such term in such statute.

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(3) "Ocularist" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(4) "Apprentice" means a person designated an apprentice in the records of the secretary to receive from a licensed ocularist training and direct supervision in the work of an ocularist.

(5) "Stock-eye" means an ocular stock prosthesis that has not been originally manufactured or altered by the ocularist or service provider selling or fitting, or both, said prosthesis to a patient or customer. "Altered" means either taking away or adding materials, or colorization, or otherwise changing the prosthesis' appearance, function, or fit in the socket or on the implant of the patient or customer.

(6) "Modified stock-eye" means a stock-eye that has been altered in some manner by the ocularist or service provider selling or fitting, or both, said prosthesis to a patient or customer. "Altered" is as defined in subsection (5) of this section. A modified stock-eye cannot be defined as either a "custom" or "impression-fitted" eye or prosthesis by adding material that incorporates an impression-surface of the patient or customer socket or implant surfaces.

(7) "Custom-eye" means an original, newly manufactured eye or prosthesis that has been specifically crafted by an ocularist or authorized service provider for the patient or customer to whom it is sold or provided. The "custom-eye" may be either an impression-fitted eye (an impression of the socket or implant surfaces) or an empirical/wax pattern-fitted method eye, or a combination of either, as delineated in the ocularist examination.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 504; 1991 c 180 s 2; (1991 c 3 s 142 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1980 c 101 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.